Tennessee, session 114, SB0452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-4-803, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (5) and (6) and substituting:
(5) "Disability certification" has the same meaning as provided in the code;
(6) "Eligible individual" has the same meaning as provided in the code. The
eligible individual is the account owner and the designated beneficiary on the account;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-4-806(d), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(d) Contributions from a student's individualized education account to an
achieving a better life experience account for the benefit of the student may only be
expended for the student's education expenses in accordance with this part, the rules
promulgated pursuant to this part, and the code.
SECTION 3. For purposes of promulgating rules, Section 1 of this act takes effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, Section 1 of this act
takes effect on January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it. All remaining sections of this act
take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0452
000792
- 1 -